Nebraska, session 109, LB986.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 49-1446.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1446.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of the Nebraska Political
Accountability and Disclosure Act, no committee shall expend funds for the
purchase or payment of:
(1) Clothes or medical or dental expenses of a candidate or the members of
his or her immediate family;
(2) Installment payments for an automobile owned by a candidate;
(3) Mortgage or rental payments for a permanent residence of a candidate;
(4) The satisfaction of personal debts, including installment payments on
personal loans, except campaign loans subject to reporting required by
subsection (2) of section 49-1456;
(5) Personal services, including the services of a lawyer or accountant,
except campaign services subject to reporting pursuant to the provisions of
section 49-1455 and security services as described in subdivision (10) of
section 49-1446.03; or
(6) Office supplies, staff, or furnishings for the public office for which
an individual is a candidate for nomination or election except as set out in
subsection (2) of section 49-1446.01 and subdivision (10) of section
49-1446.03.
Sec. 2. Section 49-1446.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
49-1446.03 Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Political
Accountability and Disclosure Act, any committee may, in addition to the
expenditures set forth in section 49-1446.01, make expenditures for the
following:
(1) The necessary continued operation of the campaign office or offices of
the candidate or political committee;
(2) Social events primarily for the benefit of campaign workers and
volunteers or constituents;
(3) Obtaining public input and opinion;
(4) Repayment of campaign loans incurred prior to election day;
(5) Newsletters and other communications for the purpose of information,
thanks, acknowledgment, or greetings or for the purpose of political
organization and planning;
(6) Gifts of acknowledgment, including flowers and charitable
contributions, except that gifts to any one individual shall not exceed fifty
dollars in any one calendar year;
(7) Meals, lodging, and travel by an officeholder related to his or her
candidacy and for members of the immediate family of the officeholder when
involved in activities related to his or her candidacy;
(8) Conference fees, meals, lodging, and travel by an officeholder and his
or her staff when involved in activities related to the duties of his or her
public office; and
(9) In the case of the candidate committee for the Governor, conference
fees, meals, lodging, and travel by the Governor, his or her staff, and his or
her immediate family, when involved in activities related to the duties of the
Governor; and .
(10) Security services and systems, including security personnel,
hardware, software, electronic security equipment, installation, maintenance,
monitoring and other reasonable physical and structural security measures and
improvements.
Sec. 3. Original sections 49-1446.02 and 49-1446.03, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-